Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 7. Telegraph and Telephone Companies.

§ 77-9-701.
Offices of telegraph companies.

Every telegraph company shall establish and maintain offices for the transaction of business with the public in its capacity as a common carrier, at each city, town, and village convenient to its routes, if, in the opinion of the public service commission, the public convenience and necessity requires it. An office once established shall not be discontinued without the consent of the commission, which has authority to require such a company to establish and maintain offices. The commission has authority to require telegraph companies to keep night operators at every place where, in its judgment, the business and the public convenience justify and require it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4328; 1906, § 4882; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7669; 1930, § 7057; 1942, § 7833; Laws, 1908, ch. 80.

§ 77-9-703.
Duty of telegraph and telephone companies to transmit messages; penalty for failure, neglect or refusal.

A telegraph or telephone company shall transmit all written messages between points where it may have offices within the state. If the telegraph or telephone company shall receive any message or matter at one of its offices in this state for transmission to a person addressed at a point where it has an office in the state, and shall fail, neglect or refuse without good and sufficient reason to transmit the same in a reasonable time to the office at the place of the person addressed, such person or the person injured shall be entitled to recover of the company in default the sum of fifteen dollars, in addition to damages for any injury. This section shall not apply to offices of telephone and telegraph companies in towns of less than one thousand inhabitants where the telephone or telegraph companies do not employ and control the operator.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4880; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7666; 1930, ch. 7058; 1942, § 7834; Laws, 1908, ch. 78.

§ 77-9-705.
Duty of telegraph and telephone companies to deliver messages; penalty for failure, neglect or refusal.

A telegraph or telephone company shall deliver all messages addressed to a person residing or having a place of business in any city, town, or village where it may have an office, or within one mile of its office. If any telegraph or telephone company shall receive any message or matter for transmission, and shall fail, neglect, or refuse, without good and sufficient reason, to transmit correctly or deliver the same within a reasonable time to the person addressed, such person, or the person injured, shall be entitled to recover of the company in default the sum of twenty-five dollars, in addition to damages for any injury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4326; 1906, § 4879a; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7665; 1930, § 7059; 1942, § 7835; Laws, 1908, ch. 76.

§ 77-9-707.
Evidence of transmission of telegram in suits against telegraph companies.

In any suit against a telegraph company for nondelivery or failure to promptly deliver any telegram in this state, the copy of the telegram received and transcribed by such company’s operator at the office of final destination shall be conclusive evidence in the hands of the bona fide addressee of the filing of the original at the receiving office of such telegram by the sender thereof, and may be introduced at the trial of such suit as the best evidence of the filing of the original at the receiving office of such telegram by the sender thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7667; 1930, § 7060; 1942, § 7836; Laws, 1916, ch. 133.

§ 77-9-709.
Duty of telegraph and telephone companies to transmit public messages.

Telegraph or telephone companies or associations shall be bound, on application of any officer of this state, or of the United States, in case of any war, insurrection, riot, or other civil commotion or resistance of public authority, or for the prevention and punishment of crime, or for the arrest of persons suspected or charged therewith, to give to the communications of such officers immediate dispatch at the price of ordinary communications of the same length.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 49; 1871, § 2434; 1880, § 1039; 1892, § 857; 1906, § 928; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4102; 1930, § 7064; 1942, § 7840.

§ 77-9-711.
Erection of telegraph and telephone lines.

All companies or associations of persons incorporated or organized for the purpose of constructing telegraph or telephone lines shall be authorized to construct the same, and to set up and erect their posts and fixtures along and across any of the public highways, streets, or waters, and along and across all turnpikes, railroads, and canals, and also through any of the public lands. Such lines, posts and fixtures shall be so constructed and placed as not to be dangerous to persons or property, and as not to interfere with the common use of such roads, streets, or waters, or with the convenience of any landowner more than may be unavoidable. In case it shall be necessary to cross any highway, such lines, posts and fixtures shall be so constructed as to cross such highway at right angles.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 45; 1871, § 2430; 1880, § 1065; 1892, § 854; 1906, § 925; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4099; 1930, § 7061; 1942, § 7837.

§ 77-9-713.
Local authorities may regulate construction and maintenance of lines.

The board of supervisors of any county, and the governing authorities of any city, town or village, through which any telegraph or telephone line may pass, shall have power to regulate, within their respective limits, the manner in which the same shall be constructed and maintained, with a view to the safe and convenient use of the public highways and streets. If the proprietors of any telegraph or telephone line refuse or omit to comply with such regulations, the board of supervisors, or the authorities of the city, town or village, may cause such line to be abated within its jurisdiction as a nuisance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 46; 1871, § 2431; 1880, § 1066; 1892, § 855; 1906, § 926; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4100; 1930, § 7062; 1942, § 7838.

§ 77-9-715.
Liability for damages caused by erection, continuance and use of lines.

Telegraph and telephone companies or associations shall be responsible for any damages which any person shall sustain by the erection, continuance, and use of telegraph and telephone lines and the fixtures thereof. In any action for the recovery thereof brought by any owner or possessor of land over or along which such line may run, damages shall be assessed for the permanent continuance of such line and fixtures, and on payment thereof the right to continue and use such line and fixtures shall exist as if by leave and license of the owner of the land.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 47; 1871, § 2432; 1880, § 1065; 1892, 856; 1906, § 927; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4101; 1930, § 7063; 1942, § 7839.

§ 77-9-717.
Exercise of eminent domain for construction of new lines.

Telegraph and telephone companies, for the purpose of constructing new lines, are empowered to exercise the right of eminent domain, as provided in Chapter 27 of Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 858; 1906, § 929; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4103; 1930, § 7065; 1942, § 7841.

§ 77-9-719.
Consolidation and merger of telephone lines, exchanges and property authorized.

All telephone lines, exchanges and properties in any county of the State of Mississippi may be consolidated and merged so as to create and establish a telephone system in such county and to enable all patrons of such telephone properties to secure telephonic service over and through one system. When such merger and consolidation of the said telephone properties shall have been effected it shall be done in such manner as to eliminate all telephone exchanges of the said constituent companies in such consolidation or merger in such county saving and excepting one system of exchanges. When such consolidation and merger shall have been effected, the same shall be done in such manner as to provide one central telephone exchange in each of the municipalities situated in the county, in which such consolidation and merger shall have been effected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7067; Laws, 1943, § 7843; Laws, 1922, ch. 268.

§ 77-9-721.
Local authorities, public service commission, and attorney-general must consent to consolidation and merger.

The consolidation and merger of the said telephone properties in any county or in any of the municipalities located in such county shall not take effect until the individuals, associations or corporations owning the said telephone properties which are operating in such county or such municipalities shall have first obtained from the governing authority of each of the municipalities affected by such consolidation and merger as is proposed to be effected, the consent of such municipality to such consolidation and merger. Such consent shall be evidenced by an order of the governing authority of such municipality or municipalities duly and regularly entered upon the minutes of the said governing authority, giving its assent to such merger and consolidation. No consolidation and merger of the said telephone properties shall be effected until the individuals, associations or corporations owning such telephone system shall have also obtained the consent of the public service commission of the State of Mississippi to such consolidation and merger to be evidenced by an order of the said commission, duly and regularly entered upon its minutes. No consolidation of the telephone properties in such county or the municipalities located therein, shall be effected until the individuals, associations or corporations owning such telephone properties shall have produced in the office of the commission duly certified copies of the orders of the governing authority of the municipality, or municipalities, affected by such proposed consolidation and merger evidencing its assent thereto, as above provided. The said consolidation and merger shall not become finally effective and complete until the attorney-general of the State of Mississippi shall have given his certificate that such consolidation and merger is not contrary to the public welfare of the State of Mississippi and is in accordance with the terms of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7068; 1942, § 7844; Laws, 1922, ch. 268.

§ 77-9-723.
Nothing in preceding sections shall mandate consolidation and merger.

Nothing in Sections 77-9-719 and 77-9-721, shall be construed so as to require and compel any rural telephone system now being operated in any of the counties of the State of Mississippi, or that may be hereafter established in any of the said counties, to merge and consolidate with each other, or with any other telephone system now being operated in said counties. Nothing in said sections shall be construed so as to require telephone systems being operated and maintained by local communities for the use and benefit of the localities or communities only, to merge and consolidate with each other, or with other telephone systems.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7069; 1942, § 7845; Laws, 1922, ch. 268.

§ 77-9-725.
Blacklisting of telegraphers because of union affiliation is unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any telegraph company, telephone company, telegraph press association, railroad company, or any leased wire firm or private individual doing business in this state, and employing telegraphers for the purpose of transmitting telegraph dispatches for the general public, or any press association or private business, or in the operation of any railroad, to discriminate against any such telegrapher in its service or out of its service, or to blacklist or refuse employment to any telegrapher solely because of such telegrapher’s affiliation with or membership in any lawful organization or trade or labor union of telegraphers.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7688; 1930, § 7131; 1942, § 7890; Laws, 1908, ch. 93.

§ 77-9-727.
Conspiracy to blacklist telegrapher is unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any two or more such telegraph or telephone companies, telegraph press associations, railroad companies or leased wire firms or private individuals doing business in this state and employing telegraphers, to conspire, contract, mutually agree or co-operate to discriminate against, blacklist or refuse employment to any telegrapher merely on account of such telegrapher’s affiliation with or membership in any lawful organization or trade or labor union of telegraphers.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7690; 1930, § 7133; 1942, § 7892; Laws, 1908, ch. 93.

§ 77-9-729.
Telegrapher discriminated against may recover actual and exemplary damages.

Any such telegraph or telephone company, telegraph press association, railroad company or leased wire firm or private individual violating Section 77-9-725, shall be liable in actual and exemplary damages to the person so discriminated against.

Any telegraph or telephone company, telegraph press association, railroad company, or leased wire firm or private individual violating Section 77-9-727, shall be jointly and severally liable in actual and exemplary damages to the party so aggrieved.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 7689, 7691; 1930, §§ 7132, 7134; 1942, §§ 7891, 7893; Laws, 1908, ch. 93.